Nevada, session 83, AB209.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 201 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby declares that the public policy
of this State is to encourage victims of serious violent crimes to
report such crimes and to participate in the criminal justice
system. Those persons who are working in sex industries that are
criminalized by state law often do not report serious crimes
committed against themselves because of fear of arrest and
prosecution for sex work. Providing immunity from criminal
liability to prostitutes engaging in prostitution or solicitation for
prostitution ensures that victims of serious violent crimes that
occur during prostitution offenses may come forward to report the
perpetrators without fear of arrest and prosecution.
Sec. 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
prostitute is immune from criminal liability for committing a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
violation of NRS 201.353 or paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
207.030 if:
1. The prostitute seeks medical assistance from a 911
emergency service or medical provider; and
2. The evidence for the alleged violation was obtained as a
result of:
(a) The prostitute seeking medical assistance;
(b) The immediate need for medical assistance; or
(c) The reporting of a need for medical assistance.
Sec. 4. NRS 201.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
201.295 As used in NRS 201.295 to 201.440, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older.
2. “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
3. “Induce” means to persuade, encourage, inveigle or entice.
4. “Prostitute” means a male or female person who for a fee,
monetary consideration or other thing of value engages in sexual
intercourse, oral-genital contact or any touching of the sexual organs
or other intimate parts of a person for the purpose of arousing or
gratifying the sexual desire of either person.
5. “Prostitution” means engaging in sexual conduct with
another person in return for a fee, monetary consideration or other
thing of value.
6. “Sexual conduct” means any of the acts enumerated in
subsection 4.
7. “Transports” means to transport or cause to be transported,
by any means of conveyance, into, through or across this State, or to
aid or assist in obtaining such transportation.
Sec. 5. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
offense committed on or after October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)